District of Columbia statutes.
47-308.04

Replacement schedule for capital assets.

The Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia shall develop a 15-year replacement schedule for the capital assets of the District government. The schedule shall be prepared in a form that reflects both the adopted capital improvements plan and a replacement schedule for District capital assets. The Chief Financial Officer shall report to the Council and the Mayor on the replacement schedule on an annual basis, with the initial report due on October 1, 2015. All agencies shall cooperate with any requests made by the Chief Financial Officer related to this section.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1043(b), 61 DCR 9990

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of § 47-308.04, see § 1043(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of § 47-308.04, see § 1043(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of § 47-308.04, see § 1043(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).